Utah statutes.
77-27-4.   Chairperson and vice chairperson.

(1)  The governor shall select one of the members of the board to serve as chairperson and board administrator at the governor's pleasure.   The chairperson may exercise the duties and powers, in addition to those established by this chapter, necessary for the administration of daily operations of the board, including personnel, budgetary matters, panel appointments, and scheduling of hearings.

(2)  The chairperson shall appoint a vice chairperson to act in the absence of the chairperson.



Amended by Chapter 195, 1990 General Session

